District of Columbia statutes.
50-1803

Standards for safety belts.

Safety belts shall conform to applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards established pursuant to § 103 of title 1 of the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966 (15 U.S.C. § 1392 ).

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-73, § 4, 32 DCR 6344

Expiration of Law 6-73

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1801.

15 U.S.C. § 1392, referred to in this section, was repealed in 1994 by P.L. 103-272, § 7(b). For present law, see 49 U.S.C. § 30101 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 40-1603.